Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.190.070

Students in residential schools, detention facilities, and adult correctional facilities—Funding—Procedures for reporting enrollment.

Beginning in the 2021-22 school year, enrollments for students in residential schools as defined in RCW 28A.190.005, for juveniles in detention facilities as identified by RCW 28A.190.010, and for individuals under the age of 18 who are incarcerated in adult correctional facilities may be funded above one full-time equivalent, provided that enrollments above one full-time equivalent allow for participation in dropout reengagement programs as defined in RCW 28A.175.105. State funding for enrollments in dropout reengagement programs in addition to institutional education facility enrollments must be allocated pursuant to RCW 28A.175.110 excluding administrative fees. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop procedures for school districts to report student enrollment in institutional education facilities and dropout reengagement programs.

[ 2021 c 164 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 164: See note following RCW 28A.190.005.